Florida, session 2026, HB1555.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
37
38 Section 1. Section 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, is created
39 to read:
40 1004.0983 Florida College System institution and state
41 university admissions reporting requirements.—
42 (1) For purposes of this section, the term:
43 (a) "Admissions data" means information related to
44 applications for admission, the disposition of applications for
45 admission, and enrollments for undergraduate and graduate
46 programs.
47 (b) "GPA" means any numerical measure of an applicant's
48 academic performance at any preceding educational institution
49 that is requested or used as part of the admissions process.
50 (c) "Institution" means Florida College System
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1555-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1555 2026
51 institutions and state universities.
52 (d) "Standardized test" means a test that is considered
53 part of the admissions process and is administered and scored in
54 a consistent manner with the same questions, testing conditions,
55 and scoring procedures for all test takers, including, but not
56 limited to, the SAT, ACT, GRE, LSAT, MCAT, and GMAT.
57 (2) Annually, the board of trustees of each institution
58 must submit to the Department of Education a report detailing
59 it's admissions data from the previous academic year for the
60 institution and for each undergraduate program, graduate
61 program, and professional school that conducts its own
62 admissions process. The report must include all of the following
63 deidentified data aggregated by race, ethnicity, and sex:
64 (a) The total number of applicants to the institution.
65 (b) The average and median standardized test scores for
66 applicants to the institution.
67 (c) The average and median GPAs for all applicants to the
68 institution.
69 (d) The total number of applicants offered admission to
70 the institution.
71 (e) The average and median standardized test scores for
72 all applicants offered admission to the institution.
73 (f) The average and median GPAs for all applicants offered
74 admission to the institution.
75 (g) The total number of applicants who enroll in the
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1555-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1555 2026
76 institution.
77 (h) The standardized test scores for all applicants who
78 enroll in the institution.
79 (i) The average and median GPAs for all applicants who
80 enroll in the institution.
81
82 If an undergraduate program, graduate program, or professional
83 school has its own GPA requirements, such GPAs must be included
84 in the data reported under paragraphs (c), (f), and (i).
85 (3) The board of trustees of an institution may not
86 delegate its duties under this section to any other person,
87 official, or entity.
88 (4) The State Board of Education and the Board of
89 Governors may adopt rules and regulations, respectively, to
90 administer this section.
91 Section 2. Section 1004.0984, Florida Statutes, is created
92 to read:
93 1004.0984 Training and licensing requirements for Florida
94 College System institutions and state universities.—
95 (1) For purposes of this section, the term "institution"
96 has the same meaning as in s. 1004.0983(1).
97 (2) An institution may not require any officer, employee,
98 student, or other member of the institution to attend or
99 participate in training that endorses the concepts outlined in
100 s. 1000.05(4)(a). This subsection may not be construed to
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1555-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1555 2026
101 prohibit discussion of the concepts listed in s. 1000.05(4)(a)
102 as part of a larger course of training or instruction, provided
103 such training or instruction is given in an objective manner
104 without endorsement of the concepts.
105 (3)(a) Any officer, employee, student, or other member of
106 an institution who is subjected to a violation of subsection (2)
107 may bring a civil action, within 3 years of the violation,
108 against any person, in the person's individual capacity for:
109 1. Declaratory or injunctive relief.
110 2. Compensatory damages.
111 3. Punitive damages.
112 4. Statutory damages of $25,000 per violation.
113 5. Attorney fees and costs.
114 (b) For purposes of this subsection, a state court may not
115 recognize any form of official immunity from suit, such as
116 qualified immunity, on behalf of the person subject to suit.
117 (c) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as a
118 waiver of the state's sovereign immunity.
119 Section 3. Section 1004.0985, Florida Statutes, is created
120 to read:
121 1004.0985 Public disclosure for Florida College System
122 institutions and state universities.—
123 (1) For purposes of this section, the term "institution"
124 has the same meaning as in s. 1004.0983(1).
125 (2) Each institution must maintain a publicly accessible
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1555-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1555 2026
126 website that publishes the following educational materials and
127 extracurricular materials:
128 (a) A course description of each course offered at the
129 institution.
130 (b) The current syllabus for each course, including
131 required readings, assignment descriptions, and grading
132 criteria.
133 (c) Any existing lecture materials that are representative
134 of the material to be covered in each course.
135 (d) A list of each club, organization, and association
136 recognized by the institution.
137 (e) A mission statement for each club, organization, and
138 association recognized by the institution.
139 (f) A statement of purpose for each club, organization,
140 and association recognized by the institution.
141 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1555-00